North Carolina statutes. Chapter 120. General Assembly.
Article 12Q. Joint Legislative Emergency Management Oversight Committee.

§ 120-70.150.
Creation and membership of Joint Legislative Emergency Management Oversight Committee.

The Joint Legislative Emergency Management Oversight Committee is established. The Committee consists of 12 members as follows:

Six members of the Senate appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate; and

Six members of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.Terms on the Committee are for two years and begin on the convening of the General Assembly in each odd-numbered year, except the terms of the initial members, which begin on appointment and end on the day of the convening of the 2013 General Assembly. Members may complete a term of service on the Committee even if they do not seek reelection or are not reelected to the General Assembly, but resignation or removal from service in the General Assembly constitutes resignation or removal from service on the Committee.A member continues to serve until a successor is appointed. A vacancy shall be filled by the officer who made the original appointment.

History.

2012-90, s. 6.

§ 120-70.151.
Purpose and powers of Committee.

The Joint Legislative Emergency Management Oversight Committee shall examine, on a continuing basis, issues related to emergency management in North Carolina in order to make ongoing recommendations to the General Assembly on ways to promote effective emergency preparedness, management, response, and recovery. The Committee may examine:

Whether the State building code sufficiently addresses issues related to commercial and residential construction in hurricane and flood prone areas.

The public health infrastructure in place to respond to natural and nonnatural disasters.

Hurricane preparedness, evacuation, and response.

Energy security issues.

Terrorism preparedness and response, including bioterrorism.

Flood and natural disaster preparation and response.

Any other topic the Committee believes is related to its purpose.

The Committee may make interim reports to the General Assembly on matters for which it may report to a regular session of the General Assembly. A report to the General Assembly may contain any legislation needed to implement a recommendation of the Committee.

History.

2012-90, s. 6.

§ 120-70.152.
Organization of Committee.

The President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall each designate a cochair of the Joint Legislative Emergency Management Oversight Committee. The Committee shall meet upon the joint call of the cochairs.

A quorum of the Committee is seven members. Only recommendations, including proposed legislation, receiving at least six affirmative votes may be included in a Committee report to the General Assembly. While in the discharge of its official duties, the Committee has the powers of a joint committee under

G.S. 120-19

and

G.S. 120-19

.1 through

G.S. 120-19.4

.

The cochairs of the Committee may call upon other knowledgeable persons or experts to assist the Committee in its work.

Members of the Committee shall receive subsistence and travel expenses as provided in

G.S. 120-3.1

, 138-5, or 138-6, as appropriate. The Committee may contract for consultants or hire employees in accordance with

G.S. 120-32.02

. The Legislative Services Commission, through the Legislative Services Officer, shall assign professional staff to assist the Committee in its work. Upon the direction of the Legislative Services Commission, the Supervisors of Clerks of the Senate and of the House of Representatives shall assign clerical staff to the Committee. The expenses for clerical employees shall be borne by the Committee.

In appointing members to the Committee, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall take into consideration the goal of having members appointed to the Committee who have knowledge and experience relating to areas that are most impacted by disasters and emergencies.

History.

2012-90, s. 6.

§§ 120-70.153,
120-70.154.

Reserved for future codification purposes.